West Virginia, session 2026, HB5042.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-125a. Placement of children in approved facilities; exceptions. (a) No child in the custody of the state shall be placed in a facility that has not been approved by Department of Human Services. (b) In extraordinary circumstances only, the Secretary of the Department of Human Services may approve for a child to be placed in an unapproved facility. (c) The Department of Human Services shall provide a list of approved out-of-state placement facilities for children in the custody of the state.(1) The Department of Human Services shall update this list at least annually. (2) The Department of Human Services shall create a level of standards for out of state facilities.(3) The list shall include the location and the specialty of each facility.